derivation_rules.xfst
!!!!!!!! RULES FOR NOMINAL-TO-VERB DERIVATION IN FINNISH !!!!!!!!!

clear stack

! Read lexicon and make a regex of it
read lexc derivation_lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon ;
regex Lexicon ;

define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | ö ] ;
define Cons  [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | 
               n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ] ;

!-------- Sound changes caused by derivation ---------!

! Sound changes in +Freq -ele suffix: "kalasta-ele-a" -> "kalasta-ell-a"
define EleToInf e -> l || l _ (?) %# [ a | ä ] ;

! Sound changes in stem caused by +Freq -ele suffix: "kalasta-ell-a" -> "kalast-ell-a" 
define AellaToElla [ a | ä ] -> 0 || _ ("@D.END.C@" | "@R.END.C@" | "@R.END.A@" | "@R.ADJ.EA@") ("@D.GRAD.S@") ("@R.SYL.2@" | "@R.SYL.3@")  e l l %# ;

! Gradation in stem caused by +Freq -ele suffix: "jarrutt-ell-a" -> "jarrut-ell-a"
define TToZero t -> 0 || _ t ("@D.END.C@" | "@R.END.A@" | "@R.ADJ.EA@") ("@D.GRAD.S@") ("@R.SYL.2@" | "@R.SYL.3@") e l l %# ;

! Gradation of t after l or r: "sammal-t-ella" -> "sammal-l-ell-a"
define TToL t -> l || l ("@U.END.C@") %^ ("@R.SYL.2@") _ ("@R.END.C@") ("@R.SYL.2@") e l l %# ; 
define TToR t -> r || r ("@U.END.C@") %^ ("@R.SYL.2@") _ ("@R.END.C@") ("@R.SYL.2@") e l l %# ;

! Final a/ä omitted before UtU and UttA ending in -eA and -aa ending stems: "kostea" -> "koste-utta-a"
define AToZero [ a | ä ] -> 0 || [ e | a ] _ (?) %^ [ u | y ] t ;

! Vowel omitted before -Oi and -OitU suffixes: "raunio" -> "rauni-oitu-a"
define VowelToZero [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | ö ] -> 0 || _ ("@U.END.A@") %^ ("@R.SYL.2@" | "@R.SYL.3@")  [ o | ö ] i ;

! Final a changes to o before -ittA/-ittU suffix: "kunnia" -> "kunnio-itta-a" (but not ä! "metsä" -> mets-ittä-ä")
define AToO a -> o || _ ("@U.GRAD.W@") ("@U.END.A@") %^ ("@R.SYL.2@" | "@R.SYL.3@") i t t ; 

! -inen changes to -is in adjectives before suffix
define InenToIs {inen} -> {is} || _ %^ t ;

! Infinitive -A becomes -dA after -oi- suffix: "idea" -> "ide-oi-da"
define AToDa 0 -> d || [ o | ö ] i ("@R.SYL.3@") ("@D.END.C@") %# _ [ a | ä ] ;

!------- Vowel harmony rules ----------!

define SetBackVowel A -> a, O -> o, U -> u || [ a | o | u ] ?* _ ;
define SetFrontVowel A -> ä, O -> ö, U -> y || _ ;

!---------- Delete boundary markers --------!
define CleanUp  %^ -> 0, %# -> 0 ;

! Compose lexicon with rules
regex Lexicon 
	.o. SetBackVowel 
	.o. SetFrontVowel
	.o. AToZero 
	.o. VowelToZero
	.o. AToO
	.o. AToDa
	.o. InenToIs
	.o. EleToInf
	.o. AellaToElla
	.o. TToZero
	.o. TToL
	.o. TToR
	.o. CleanUp ;

! Output all surface forms of the words
lower-words
